District of Columbia statutes.
2-1561

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Youth” means an individual who is at least 13 years of age and no older than 22 years of age.

(2)

“Youth Council” means the District of Columbia Youth Advisory Council established by § 2-1562.

History

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-145, § 2, 49 DCR 4063

Editor's Notes

Establishment of the D.C. Youth Investment Collaborative, see Mayor’s Order 2002-44, March 8, 2002 ( 49 DCR 2247).